Maine, session 132, LD1.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. 24-A MRSA c. 101 is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 101
HOME RESILIENCY PROGRAM
§7701. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Administrator. "Administrator" means the bureau or an entity with which the
bureau contracts for the administration of the program.
2. Fund. "Fund" means the Home Resiliency Fund established in section 7702.
3. Grant. "Grant" means the award of funds for an approved project.
4. Home resiliency project; project. "Home resiliency project" or "project" means a
project designed to make a home more resistant to damage from extreme weather events.
5. Program. "Program" means the Home Resiliency Program established in section
7702.
§7702. Home Resiliency Program
1. Program established. The Home Resiliency Program is established within and
under the direction of the bureau to provide grants to homeowners for the purpose of
performing home resiliency projects.
2. Home Resiliency Fund. The Home Resiliency Fund is established as a nonlapsing
Other Special Revenue Funds account administered by the bureau for the purposes of
funding the program. The bureau may transfer available balances from other bureau
accounts to the fund, and the fund may receive money from any gift, grant, contribution,
legislative appropriation, allocation or transfer or bond proceeds. The money in the fund
may be used only for the purpose of awarding grants under the program and paying the
costs of the administration of the program.
3. Program administration. The bureau may contract with other entities for the
administration of the program and other services, including, but not limited to:
A. Promotion of the program, including the creation and maintenance of a publicly
accessible website containing information about the program;
Page 2 - 132LR0939(03)

B. Development of an application form;
C. Verification of applicant eligibility;
D. Determination and distribution of grants;
E. Establishment of standards for project completion, including contractor approval;
F. Verification of project completion;
G. Development of a mechanism for the return of unused grant money;
H. Development of a list of home resiliency projects that would be eligible for a grant;
and
I. Development of standards to be used to determine whether a home resiliency project
has been completed satisfactorily.
4. Program eligibility. An individual is eligible for a grant if the individual:
A. Has not previously received a grant under the program;
B. Submits an application on a form approved by the administrator;
C. In the application submitted under paragraph B, designates a home resiliency project
from the list approved pursuant to subsection 5 to be performed on a home:
(1) Owned by the applicant;
(2) In which the applicant resides as the applicant's permanent residence; and
(3) That was not the subject of a previous home resiliency project; and
D. Submits all information regarding the individual, the individual's home and the
proposed home resiliency project as required by the bureau and the administrator.
5. Home resiliency projects; list. The bureau and the administrator of the project shall
approve a list of prospective projects eligible for grants under the program. The
administrator shall publish the list of approved prospective home resiliency projects in the
promotional materials for the program and on the publicly accessible website maintained
to promote the program.
6. Grant determination. The bureau may establish 2 or more tiers of eligibility based
on factors that reflect the income or financial means of the applicant. The bureau shall set
maximum grant amounts and, if income or financial means tiers are established, shall set
the maximum grant amounts for each tier. The administrator shall make grants under the
program to eligible persons. The administrator shall review applications in the order in
which they are received. An application is considered received when all required
information has been submitted. The administrator shall award grants under the program
until funds in the fund are exhausted.
7. Post-grant verification. The recipient of a grant under the program shall provide
to the administrator information that is required by the administrator and that is sufficient
to allow the administrator to verify that the home resiliency project has been completed
within the standards developed under subsection 3 for home resiliency project completion
within 2 years of the grant. The recipient of a grant shall return to the administrator any
funds provided to the recipient but not used for the approved project.
Page 3 - 132LR0939(03)

8. No private right of action. This chapter does not provide an express or implied
private right of action.
9. Rulemaking. The superintendent may adopt rules necessary to implement the
program. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
§7703. Date of grants
The bureau and the administrator are not required to award a grant before May 1, 2026.
Sec. A-2. Transfers from available fiscal year 2024-25 Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation, Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special
Revenue Funds balances to the Department of Professional and Financial
Regulation, Home Resiliency Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before 90 days following the
effective date of this Act, the State Controller shall transfer $15,000,000 from available
balances in the Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation to the Department of Professional
and Financial Regulation, Home Resiliency Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. A-3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Home Resiliency Fund N964
Initiative: Provides an allocation for the Home Resiliency Fund to provide grants to
homeowners to reduce their risks and losses in future storm events, including roof damage
prevention, basement flooding risk reduction and targeted interventions that have been
proven to reduce risks from extreme weather events.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,500,000 $7,500,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $7,500,000 $7,500,000
PART B
Sec. B-1. 37-B MRSA §747 is enacted to read:
§747. Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation Revolving Loan
Fund
1. Fund established. The Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation
Revolving Loan Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," is established as a dedicated,
nonlapsing fund administered by the agency for the purpose of providing a state match for
United States Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency
disaster and hazard mitigation revolving low-interest loan funds to support county,
municipal and tribal government infrastructure projects that reduce risks from extreme
weather events and other natural hazards such as flooding and damaging winds to the extent
allowed by federal laws and regulations.
Page 4 - 132LR0939(03)

2. Sources of funding. The fund consists of any money received from the following
sources:
A. Contributions from private sources;
B. Federal funds and grant awards;
C. The proceeds of any bonds issued for the purposes for which the fund is established;
and
D. Any other funds received in support of the purposes for which the fund is
established.
3. Disbursements from fund. The agency shall apply the money in the fund to provide
for grants and loans to support municipal and tribal government infrastructure projects that
reduce risks from extreme weather events and other natural hazards such as flooding and
damaging winds to the extent allowed by federal laws and regulations.
4. Rulemaking. The agency may adopt rules as necessary to accomplish the purpose
of the fund and to meet state and federal requirements for the proper administration of this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. B-2. Transfers from available fiscal year 2024-25 Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation, Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special
Revenue Funds balances to the Department of Defense, Veterans and
Emergency Management, Administration - Maine Emergency Management
Agency, Disaster Recovery Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before 90 days following the
effective date of this Act, the State Controller shall transfer $10,000,000 from available
balances in the Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation to the Department of Defense,
Veterans and Emergency Management, Administration - Maine Emergency Management
Agency, Disaster Recovery Fund Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. B-3. Transfers from available fiscal year 2024-25 Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation, Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special
Revenue Funds balances to the Department of Defense, Veterans and
Emergency Management, Administration - Maine Emergency Management
Agency, Other Special Revenue Funds account. Notwithstanding any provision of
law to the contrary, on or before 90 days following the effective date of this Act, the State
Controller shall transfer $477,313 from available balances in the Insurance - Bureau of,
Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of Professional and Financial
Regulation to the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management,
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency, Other Special Revenue Funds
account.
Sec. B-4. Transfers from available fiscal year 2024-25 Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation, Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special
Revenue Funds balances to the Department of Defense, Veterans and
Emergency Management, Administration - Maine Emergency Management
Agency, Other Special Revenue Funds account. Notwithstanding any provision of
Page 5 - 132LR0939(03)

law to the contrary, on or before 90 days following the effective date of this Act, the State
Controller shall transfer $800,000 from available balances in the Insurance - Bureau of,
Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of Professional and Financial
Regulation to the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management,
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency, Other Special Revenue Funds
account.
Sec. B-5. Transfers from available fiscal year 2024-25 Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation, Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special
Revenue Funds balances to the Department of Defense, Veterans and
Emergency Management, Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk
Mitigation Revolving Loan Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, on or before 90 days following the
effective date of this Act, the State Controller shall transfer $750,000 from available
balances in the Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the
Department of Professional and Financial Regulation to the Department of Defense,
Veterans and Emergency Management, Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk
Mitigation Revolving Loan Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. B-6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT
OF
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Contract/Grant Specialist position through June
18, 2027 and provides allocation for related All Other costs to function as the State's first
Safeguarding Tomorrow Revolving Loan Fund administrator and to support county,
municipal and tribal governments in applying for and receiving other United States
Department of Homeland Security, Federal Emergency Management Agency funding
sources.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $96,275 $103,555
All Other $7,605 $7,711
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $103,880 $111,266
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Establishes one limited-period Communications System Manager position
through June 18, 2027 and provides allocation for related All Other costs necessary to serve
as the State's integrated public alert and warning coordinator.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
Personal Services $118,165 $127,560
All Other $8,132 $8,310
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $126,297 $135,870
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Page 6 - 132LR0939(03)

Initiative: Provides allocation to support a 2-year initiative to update the Maine Emergency
Management Agency's communications technology and warning systems statewide and
provide for technology purchases, universal language systems, training and education in
all counties to improve communications before, during and after emergency and disaster
events.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $800,000 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $800,000 $500
Administration - Maine Emergency Management Agency 0214
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Disaster Recovery Fund to meet state funding
requirements for emergency declarations.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $10,000,000 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $10,000,000 $500
Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation Revolving Loan Fund
N500
Initiative: Provides allocation to provide for the state match for a federal grant from the
federal Safeguarding Tomorrow Revolving Loan Fund, which provides capital to states to
establish revolving loan funds that provide hazard mitigation assistance to county,
municipal and tribal governments to reduce risks from extreme weather events and other
natural hazards such as flooding and damaging winds, as allowed by federal laws and
regulations. The loans are meant to complement grant assistance and help advance county,
municipal and tribal projects through low-interest loans.
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $750,000 $500
DEFENSE, VETERANS AND EMERGENCY
MANAGEMENT, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND $500 $500
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $11,780,177 $248,636
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $11,780,677 $249,136
Page 7 - 132LR0939(03)

PART C
Sec. C-1. 5 MRSA §3109, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. OOOO, §1,
is amended to read:
2. Program established; administration. The Community Resilience Partnership
Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is established within the office to
provide direction, assistance and grants to communities in the State to help the communities
reduce carbon emissions, transition to clean energy and become more resilient to the effects
of climate change. The office State Resilience Office established in section 3211 shall
administer the program to provide technical and financial assistance for local and regional
planning and implementation projects consistent with the State's emissions reduction
targets under Title 38, section 576‑A and the state climate action plan under Title 38,
section 577.
Sec. C-2. 5 MRSA c. 310-B, sub-c. 1 is enacted by adding before section 3201 the
following to read:
SUBCHAPTER 1
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Sec. C-3. 5 MRSA c. 310-B, sub-c. 2 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 2
STATE RESILIENCE OFFICE
§3211. State Resilience Office
1. Establishment; duties; administration. The State Resilience Office is established
within the office. The State Resilience Office shall coordinate and assist implementation
of the State's resilience policies and activities designed to improve resistance to extreme
weather events; collaborate with state agencies, county, municipal and tribal governments,
regional councils and county, local and tribal emergency management agencies and other
stakeholders to harmonize policy objectives and implementation of resilience policies and
activities designed to improve resistance to extreme weather events across all levels of
government; promote natural hazard risk management across all levels of government;
assist county, municipal and tribal governments in this State to manage risks from extreme
weather events and natural hazards, such as flooding and damaging winds, through
planning, technical assistance and financial support; and prioritize and coordinate projects
for federal funding.
2. Administration of certain programs. The State Resilience Office shall administer
the Community Resilience Partnership Program established in section 3109, the floodplain
management program established in Title 12, section 408 and the State Floodplain Mapping
Fund established in Title 12, section 409.
3. Report. Annually, beginning October 1, 2026, the State Resilience Office shall
report to the Bureau of Insurance within the Department of Professional and Financial
Page 8 - 132LR0939(03)

Regulation and the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
insurance matters on the uses, activities and outcomes supported by funds from the transfer
made pursuant to Title 24-A, section 606.
4. Rulemaking. The State Resilience Office may adopt rules as necessary for the
proper administration of this subchapter. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are
routine technical rules as defined in chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
§3212. State Resilience Fund
1. Fund established. The State Resilience Fund, referred to in this section as "the
fund," is established as a dedicated, nonlapsing fund administered by the office for the
purpose of providing funds for the mitigation of risk to communities, buildings and
infrastructure from extreme weather events and other natural hazards such as flooding and
damaging winds.
2. Sources of funding. The fund consists of any money received from the following
sources:
A. Contributions from private sources;
B. Federal funds and grant awards;
C. The proceeds of any bonds issued for the purposes for which the fund is established;
and
D. Any state or other funds received in support of the purposes for which the fund is
established.
3. Disbursements from fund. The office shall apply funds in the fund to support
data, planning tools, technical assistance and project funding designed to increase the
resilience of county, municipal and tribal governments, state and local infrastructure,
businesses and other state entities to risks from extreme weather events and natural hazards
such as flooding and damaging winds.
Sec. C-4. 12 MRSA §408, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. HH, §1 and affected
by §7 and amended by c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended to read:
§408. Floodplain management
The floodplain management program is established within the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry and is administered by the State Resilience Office
established in Title 5, section 3211. The department State Resilience Office shall serve as
the state coordinating agency for the National Flood Insurance Program pursuant to 44
Code of Federal Regulations, Part 60 and in that capacity shall oversee delivery of technical
assistance and resources to municipalities for the purpose of floodplain management
activities and shall administer the State Floodplain Mapping Fund under section 409.
Sec. C-5. 12 MRSA §409, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. HH, §2 and affected
by §7 and amended by c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended to read:
§409. State Floodplain Mapping Fund
1. Fund established. The State Floodplain Mapping Fund, referred to in this section
as "the fund," is established as a dedicated, nonlapsing fund administered by in the
Page 9 - 132LR0939(03)

Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry for the purpose of providing funds
for the mapping of floodplains in the State using light detection and ranging technology.
2. Sources of funding. The fund consists of any money received from the following
sources:
A. Contributions from private sources;
B. Federal funds and awards;
C. The proceeds of any bonds issued for the purposes for which the fund is established;
and
D. Any other funds received in support of the purposes for which the fund is
established.
3. Disbursements from the fund. The Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry shall apply the money in the fund toward the support of floodplain mapping in the
State, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of light detection and ranging elevation
data and the processing and production of floodplain maps.
4. Administration of the fund. The State Resilience Office established in Title 5,
section 3211 shall administer the fund.
Sec. C-6. 24-A MRSA §606 is enacted to read:
§606. Annual transfer
Annually, beginning with the 2027-28 fiscal year, within 90 days following the end of
the immediately prior fiscal year, and upon verification by the superintendent that sufficient
surplus funds exist, the State Controller shall transfer $1,755,000 from available balances
in the bureau's Other Special Revenue Funds account to the State Resilience Fund
established in Title 5, section 3212.
Sec. C-7. Transfers from available fiscal year 2024-25 Department of
Professional and Financial Regulation, Insurance - Bureau of, Other Special
Revenue Funds balances to the Maine Office of Community Affairs, State
Resilience Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account. Notwithstanding any
provision of law to the contrary, on or before 90 days following the effective date of this
Act, the State Controller shall transfer $9,633,040 from available balances in the Insurance
- Bureau of, Other Special Revenue Funds account within the Department of Professional
and Financial Regulation to the Maine Office of Community Affairs, State Resilience
Fund, Other Special Revenue Funds account.
Sec. C-8. Transition provisions; Community Resilience Partnership
Program. The following provisions govern the transition of the administration of the
Community Resilience Partnership Program, established in the Maine Revised Statutes,
Title 5, section 3109, from the Office of Policy Innovation and the Future to the Maine
Office of Community Affairs, State Resilience Office.
1. All existing rules, regulations and procedures in effect, in operation or adopted for
the Community Resilience Partnership Program in the Office of Policy Innovation and the
Future or any of its administrative units or officers are hereby declared in effect and
continue in effect until rescinded, revised or amended by the Maine Office of Community
Affairs, State Resilience Office.
Page 10 - 132LR0939(03)

2. All existing contracts, agreements and compacts currently in effect in the
Community Resilience Partnership Program continue in effect.
3. All records, property and equipment previously belonging to or allocated for the use
of the Community Resilience Partnership Program in the Office of Policy Innovation and
the Future become, on the effective date of this Act, part of the property of the Maine Office
of Community Affairs, State Resilience Office.
4. All existing forms, licenses, letterheads and similar items bearing the name of or
referring to the Community Resilience Partnership Program may be used by the Maine
Office of Community Affairs, State Resilience Office until existing supplies of those items
are exhausted.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the State Controller shall
transfer any unobligated balances remaining in the Community Resilience Partnership
Program Other Special Revenue Funds account and federal funds to the Maine Office of
Community Affairs, State Resilience Office no later than October 1, 2025.
Sec. C-9. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
State Resilience Fund N965
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position in the State Resilience
Office to be the geospatial data science manager and provides allocation for related All
Other costs, including data storage costs.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $140,255 $151,265
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $190,255 $201,265
State Resilience Fund N965
Initiative: Provides one-time Other Special Revenue Funds allocation to the State
Resilience Office to develop, as part of a so-called Flood-Ready Maine project, an inland,
coastal and riverine hydrologic model, a new online community risk data hub of flood risk
and other hazard information for public use and to update flood maps.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $5,750,000 $0
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $5,750,000 $0
State Resilience Fund N965
Initiative: Establishes one Public Service Coordinator II position in the State Resilience
Office to be the coordinator of the certified floodplain regional program and provides
allocation for related All Other costs and for the State Resilience Office, in partnership with
the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management, Maine Emergency
Management Agency and the Department of Professional and Financial Regulation, Bureau
Page 11 - 132LR0939(03)

of Insurance, to expand state and regional capacity to assist county, municipal and tribal
governments through grants to regional service providers to employ regional certified
floodplain managers and to provide technical assistance, public engagement and county,
municipal and tribal government training to support flood risk reduction, reduced insurance
rates and increased participation in the National Flood Insurance Program.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $140,255 $151,265
All Other $1,600,000 $1,600,000
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $1,740,255 $1,751,265
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $7,680,510 $1,952,530
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $7,680,510 $1,952,530
Sec. C-10. Contingent effective date; continuation of obligations. Those
sections of this Part that amend the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 3109,
subsection 2 and Title 12, sections 408 and 409 and that portion of this Part that enacts
Title 5, section 3211, subsection 2 are contingent on the State Resilience Office established
in Title 5, section 3211 receiving funds sufficient to administer the floodplain management
program established in Title 12, section 408, the State Floodplain Mapping Fund
established in Title 12, section 409 and the Community Resilience Partnership Program
established in Title 5, section 3109. Until that contingency is met, the Department of
Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry shall continue to administer the floodplain
management program and the State Floodplain Mapping Fund and the Office of Policy
Innovation and the Future shall continue to administer the Community Resilience
Partnership Program. The Director of the Maine Office of Community Affairs shall notify
the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Clerk of the House of
Representatives and the Revisor of Statutes when the State Resilience Office receives funds
sufficient to administer the programs under this section.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 12 - 132LR0939(03)